Washington statutes.
RCW 43.105.240

Evaluation of agency information technology spending and budget requests.

(1) Pursuant to RCW 43.88.092(3), at the request of the director of financial management, the agency shall evaluate both state agency information technology current spending and technology budget requests, including those proposed by the superintendent of public instruction, in conjunction with educational service districts, or statewide or regional providers of K-12 education information technology services. The agency shall submit recommendations for funding all or part of such requests to the director of financial management. The agency shall also submit recommendations regarding consolidation and coordination of similar proposals or other efficiencies it finds in reviewing proposals.

(2) The agency shall establish criteria, consistent with portfolio-based information technology management, for the evaluation of agency budget requests under this section. Technology budget requests shall be evaluated in the context of the state's information technology portfolio; technology initiatives underlying budget requests are subject to review by the agency. Criteria shall include, but not be limited to: Feasibility of the proposed projects, consistency with the state strategic information technology plan and the state enterprise architecture, consistency with information technology portfolios, appropriate provision for public electronic access to information, evidence of business process streamlining and gathering of business and technical requirements, services, duration of investment, costs, and benefits.

[ 2024 c 54 s 8; 2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 s 207; 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 711. Formerly RCW 43.41A.050.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 1 ss 101-109, 201-224, 406-408, 410, 501-507, 601, and 602: See note following RCW 43.105.007.

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.